District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1102

Notice of application for, alteration to, or extension of charter or special privileges.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1316, ch. 854, § 767
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(8), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1102.
1981 Ed., § 29-102.
1973 Ed., § 29-102.